Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 504B.116, is amended to read: 504B.116 PRORATED RENT REQUIRED. (a) When a lease term for a residential unit ends on a date before the last day of the final month, new text begin or the lease begins on a date after the first day of the month, new text end the amount of rent to be paid for the new text begin first month or new text end final month deleted text begin owed for the final monthdeleted text end of rent must be prorated at the average daily rate for that month so that the tenant only pays for the actual number of days that occupancy is allowed. This provision applies to all leases, including leases requiring thenew text begin first ornew text end last month of rent to be paid in advance. deleted text begin Any attempted waiver of this section by a landlord and tenant, by contract or otherwise, shall bedeleted text end new text begin The requirements of this section may not be waived and any clause in a lease in violation of this section isnew text end void and unenforceable. (b) For purposes of this section, prorated rent must be calculated using the actual number of calendar days for the calendar month deleted text begin in which the lease expiresdeleted text end new text begin that is incompletenew text end . new text begin (c) Any contract clause that limits tenant remedies for this section, including a lease term that would require arbitration or prohibit a class action for violation of this section, is void and unenforceable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to leases entered into on or after that date. new text end